Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Chapter 43. Mississippi Ratite Council and Promotion Board

§§ 69-43-1 through 69-43-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2004, ch. 383, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2006.

§69-43-1. [Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997); reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§69-43-3. [Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997); reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§69-43-5. [Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997); reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 3; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§69-43-7. [Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997); reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§69-43-9. [Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997); reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§69-43-11. [Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 18, 1997); reenacted without change, Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2004.]

§ 69-43-13.
Repeal date of Sections 69-43-1 through 69-43-11.

Sections 69-43-1 through 69-43-11, shall stand repealed on July 1, 2006.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 375, § 7; Laws, 2000, ch. 331, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 383, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2004.